Connecticut, session 2026, HB05323.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 10-244a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) For the school year commencing July 1, 2013, and each school year
thereafter, no municipality or local or regional board of education may
employ or enter into an agreement, as described in subdivision (2) of
subsection (b) of section 53a-217b, with any person, other than a sworn
member of an organized local police department or a retired [police]
officer as provided in subsection (b) of this section, to provide security
services in a public school if such person will possess a firearm, as
defined in section 53a-3, while in the performance of his or her duties.
(b) A municipality or a local or regional board of education may
employ or enter into an agreement with a retired [police] officer to
provide security services in a public school if such retired [police] officer
is a (1) qualified retired law enforcement officer, as defined in 18 USC
926C, as amended from time to time, or (2) parole officer who meets the
qualifications specified for a qualified retired law enforcement officer
under 18 USC 926C, as applicable to a parole officer. Such retired

Substitute House Bill No. 5323
[police] officer shall receive annual training pursuant to section 7-294x
and shall successfully complete annual firearms training provided by a
certified firearms instructor that meets or exceeds the standards of the
Police Officer Standards and Training Council or 18 USC 926C, as
amended from time to time. Such retired [police] officer shall not be
subject to the licensing requirements of part II of chapter 534.
(c) For the purposes of subsection (b) of this section, ["retired police
officer"] (1) "retired officer" means [(1)] (A) a sworn member of an
organized local police department who was certified by the Police
Officer Standards and Training Council, [and] retired or separated in
good standing from such department [or] and is not prohibited from
being hired by a law enforcement unit pursuant to section 7-291c, (B) a
sworn member of the Division of State Police within the Department of
Emergency Services and Public Protection who retired or separated in
good standing from said division [, (2)] and is not prohibited from being
hired by a law enforcement unit pursuant to section 7-291c, (C) a sworn
federal law enforcement agent who retired or separated in good
standing from such federal law enforcement service, is not prohibited
from being hired by a law enforcement unit pursuant to section 7-291c
and [who] meets or exceeds the standards of the Police Officer
Standards and Training Council for certification in this state, [or (3)] (D)
a sworn officer of an organized police department in another state who
was certified under standards that meet or exceed the standards of the
Police Officer Standards and Training Council for certification in this
state, [and who] retired or separated in good standing from such
department and is not prohibited from being hired by a law
enforcement unit pursuant to section 7-291c, or (E) a parole officer who
retired or separated in good standing from the Department of
Correction, and (2) "good standing" means the status of a police officer
whose employment in a law enforcement unit, as defined in section 7-
294a, or a parole officer whose employment with the Department of
Correction, was not terminated as a result of disciplinary action or
Public Act No. 26-139 2 of 17

Substitute House Bill No. 5323
during a period when such police officer or parole officer was under
investigation or disciplinary action was pending.
Sec. 2. (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) The Connecticut Advisory Council for
School Administrator Professional Standards, established pursuant to
section 10-144e of the general statutes, in consultation with the
Connecticut Association of Schools, shall establish a pilot program for a
new school administrator mentorship program. Such pilot program
shall include, but need not be limited to, supports, training and
professional development for new school administrators. Not later than
July 1, 2027, the council shall report the plan for implementation of the
pilot program to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to education, in accordance with
the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes.
(b) For the school year commencing July 1, 2027, the Connecticut
Advisory Council for School Administrator Professional Standards shall
implement the pilot program in school districts identified in the plan
developed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. Not later than
January 1, 2029, the council shall report on the results of the pilot
program, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the
general statutes, to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to education. Such
report shall include, but need not be limited to, recommendations for
improvement to and requirements for the further implementation of the
pilot program.
Sec. 3. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) Not later than July 1, 2027, no
local or regional board of education shall require students in grades nine
to twelve, inclusive, who participate in any interscholastic athletics to
meet or exceed academic eligibility standards that are higher than the
academic eligibility standards established by the Connecticut
Interscholastic Athletic Conference.
Public Act No. 26-139 3 of 17

Substitute House Bill No. 5323
Sec. 4. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) The Department of Education
shall, within available appropriations, establish a grant program for the
provision of a therapeutic arts program in public schools for the school
year commencing July 1, 2027, and each school year thereafter. Such
grant shall be in an amount determined by the Commissioner of
Education and available to any local or regional board of education or
regional educational service center interested in providing a therapeutic
arts program, but the department shall prioritize boards of education or
regional educational service centers serving school districts with a high
rate of exclusionary discipline, lack of access to behavioral health
services and supports and an existing social-emotional learning
program. Not later than January 1, 2027, the department shall post in a
conspicuous location on its Internet web site information about the
grant program, including, but not limited to, eligibility criteria,
application forms and the amount of grant funds available to applicants.
(b) Not later than July 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the
Department of Education shall submit a report, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to education. Such report shall include the number of grants
awarded and recipients of such grants.
Sec. 5. (Effective from passage) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 10-264l of the general statutes, the Commissioner of Education
may authorize, for a period not to exceed two years, the temporary
placement of students enrolled in the Bridgeport Military Academy in
available classroom space at the Fairchild Wheeler Interdistrict Magnet
Campus for the purpose of facilitating construction of a permanent
facility for the Bridgeport Military Academy.
(b) The temporary placement of students authorized under this
section shall be limited to the grades and programs of the Bridgeport
Military Academy approved by the Department of Education and shall
Public Act No. 26-139 4 of 17

Substitute House Bill No. 5323
not be deemed to alter the interdistrict magnet school status of the
Fairchild Wheeler Interdistrict Magnet Campus or the eligibility of
Fairchild Wheeler Interdistrict Magnet Campus for operating grant
funding under section 10-264l of the general statutes.
(c) The Department of Education shall assign a separate facility code
to the Bridgeport Military Academy during such temporary placement
and shall continue to maintain separate enrollment, performance and
accountability metrics for both the Bridgeport Military Academy and
the Fairchild Wheeler Interdistrict Magnet Campus.
(d) The Department of Education shall establish guidelines to ensure
that such temporary placement of students does not result in the
commingling of students in core academic courses or programs, except
as expressly approved by the Commissioner of Education for purposes
consistent with each school's educational program.
(e) Upon completion of the new permanent facility, the Bridgeport
Military Academy shall vacate the temporary location and temporary
placement of students at the Fairchild Wheeler Interdistrict Magnet
Campus and resume operations in the new permanent facility.
Sec. 6. (Effective from passage) Section 51 of public act 24-41 shall take
effect July 1, 2027.
Sec. 7. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section, "broad
assessment" means an assessment that measures what students should
have learned during a semester or during a school year. "Broad
assessment" does not include the state-wide mastery examinations
under section 10-14n of the general statutes or any other student
assessments required by state or federal law.
(b) Not later than July 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Education shall
establish, within available appropriations, an incentive program for
school districts that (1) reduces or limits the amount of time students
Public Act No. 26-139 5 of 17

Substitute House Bill No. 5323
spend on taking broad assessments during the school year, (2) integrates
state-provided interim and formative assessment tools into the local
curriculum in a manner that supports ongoing instructional
improvement, and (3) increases teacher competency in the formative
assessment process. The incentive program may include public
recognition, financial awards and enhanced autonomy or operational
flexibility for school districts.
Sec. 8. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) Not later than June 1, 2027, the
Department of Education shall develop and provide guidance to local
and regional boards of education on effective strategies for reducing the
amount of discretionary local student assessments. Such guidance may
include the elimination of the fall and spring administration of broad
assessments, as defined in section 7 of this act, or substituting, where
appropriate, certain end-of-unit classroom summative assessments with
state-provided interim and formative assessment tools.
Sec. 9. (Effective from passage) The Commissioner of Education may,
after consultation with the working group established pursuant to
section 28 of public act 24-45, submit a request to the United States
Secretary of Education to amend the state's approved plan submitted
pursuant to the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, 20
USC 6301, et seq., as amended from time to time, and reauthorized by
the Every Student Succeeds Act, P.L. 114-95. Such request may include
a waiver from federal accountability requirements under said act that
allows the Department of Education to modify the state's high school
accountability model by reducing the weight assigned to the academic
achievement indicator and increasing the weight for other relevant
indicators, such as college and career-oriented measures.
Sec. 10. (Effective from passage) (a) Not later than January 1, 2027, the
Commissioner of Education shall redesign Connecticut's high school
mathematics pathways to prepare students for relevant postsecondary
careers. Such mathematics pathways shall include, but need not be
Public Act No. 26-139 6 of 17

Substitute House Bill No. 5323
limited to, (1) science, technology, engineering and mathematics, (2)
data science and statistics, (3) quantitative reasoning, and (4) workforce
and applied mathematics. The commissioner may consult with relevant
stakeholders to implement the provisions of this subsection.
(b) The commissioner, in consultation with the Connecticut Educator
Preparation and Certification Board established pursuant to section 10-
150b of the general statutes, shall develop guidelines for the role of
mathematics specialists in supporting mathematics interventions in
schools.
(c) Not later than January 1, 2027, the commissioner shall (1) develop
a list of professional development providers to support the
implementation of high-quality mathematics instruction, and (2)
explore the feasibility of launching MathConn, a professional learning
series for educators. The commissioner may consult with relevant
stakeholders to implement the provisions of this subsection.
Sec. 11. Section 10-222c of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) No local or regional board of education, governing council of a
state or local charter school, interdistrict magnet school operator or
supervisory agent of a nonpublic school shall offer employment to an
applicant for a position, including any position which is contracted for,
if such applicant would have direct student contact, prior to such board,
council, operator or supervisory agent:
(1) Requiring of such applicant:
(A) To list the name, address and telephone number of each current
or former employer of the applicant, if such current or former employer
was a local or regional board of education, council, operator or
supervisory agent or if such employment otherwise caused the
applicant to have contact with children;
Public Act No. 26-139 7 of 17

Substitute House Bill No. 5323
(B) A written authorization that (i) consents to and authorizes
disclosure by the employers listed under subparagraph (A) of this
subdivision of the information requested under subdivision (2) of this
subsection and the release of related records by such employers, (ii)
consents to and authorizes disclosure by the Department of Education
of the information requested under subdivision (3) of this subsection
and the release of related records by the department, and (iii) releases
those employers and the department from liability that may arise from
such disclosure or release of records pursuant to subdivision (2) or (3)
of this subsection; and
(C) A written statement of whether the applicant (i) has been or is the
subject of an abuse or neglect or sexual misconduct investigation, or any
investigation involving the injury or risk of injury to, or impairing the
morals of, a minor under section 53-21, by any employer, state agency
or municipal police department, [unless the investigation resulted in a
finding that all allegations were unsubstantiated,] (ii) has ever been
disciplined or asked to resign from employment or resigned from or
otherwise separated from any employment while an allegation of abuse
or neglect was pending or under investigation by the Department of
Children and Families or such employer, state agency or municipal
police department, or an allegation of sexual misconduct was pending
or under investigation by such employer, state agency or municipal
police department, or an allegation involving the injury or risk of injury
to, or impairing the morals of, a minor under section 53-21, was pending
or under investigation, or due to an allegation substantiated pursuant
to section 17a-101g of abuse or neglect, or of sexual misconduct or a
conviction for abuse or neglect or sexual misconduct, or (iii) has ever
had a professional or occupational license or certificate suspended or
revoked or has ever surrendered such a license or certificate while an
allegation of abuse or neglect was pending or under investigation by the
department or an investigation of sexual misconduct was pending or
under investigation, or an allegation involving the injury or risk of
Public Act No. 26-139 8 of 17

Substitute House Bill No. 5323
injury to, or impairing the morals of, a minor under section 53-21, was
pending or under investigation, or due to an allegation substantiated by
the department of abuse or neglect or of sexual misconduct or a
conviction for abuse or neglect or sexual misconduct;
(2) Conducting a review of the employment history of the applicant
by contacting those employers listed by the applicant under subdivision
(1) of this subsection. Such review shall be conducted using a form
developed by the Department of Education in accordance with section
3 of public act 16-67 that shall request (A) the dates of employment of
the applicant, and (B) a statement as to whether the employer has
knowledge that the applicant (i) was or is the subject of an allegation of
abuse or neglect or sexual misconduct for which there is an investigation
pending with any employer, state agency or municipal police
department or which has been substantiated, unless such substantiation
has been reversed as a result of an appeal conducted pursuant to section
17a-101k; (ii) was disciplined or asked to resign from employment or
resigned from or otherwise separated from any employment while an
allegation of abuse or neglect or sexual misconduct was or is pending or
under investigation, or due to a substantiation of abuse or neglect or
sexual misconduct, unless such substantiation has been reversed as a
result of an appeal conducted pursuant to section 17a-101k; or (iii) has
ever had a professional or occupational license, certificate, authorization
or permit suspended or revoked or has ever surrendered such a license,
certificate, authorization or permit while an allegation of abuse or
neglect or sexual misconduct was pending or under investigation, or
due to a substantiation of abuse or neglect or sexual misconduct, unless
such substantiation has been reversed as a result of an appeal conducted
pursuant to section 17a-101k. Such review may be conducted
telephonically or through written communication. Notwithstanding the
provisions of subsection (g) of section 31-51i, not later than five business
days after any such current or former employer of the applicant receives
a request for such information, such employer shall respond with and is
Public Act No. 26-139 9 of 17

Substitute House Bill No. 5323
authorized to disclose such information. A local or regional board of
education, council, operator or supervisory agent may request more
information concerning any response made by a current or former
employer, and, notwithstanding the provisions of said subsection (g),
such employer shall respond not later than five business days after
receiving such request; and
(3) Requesting information from the Department of Education
concerning (A) the eligibility status for employment of any applicant for
a position requiring a certificate, authorization or permit issued
pursuant to chapter 166, (B) whether the department has knowledge
that an investigation is pending or a finding has been substantiated by
the Department of Children and Families pursuant to section 17a-101g
of abuse or neglect or of sexual misconduct against the applicant and
any information concerning such [a] investigation or finding, and (C)
whether the department has received notification that the applicant has
been convicted of a crime or of criminal charges pending against the
applicant and any information concerning such charges.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (g) of section 31-51i,
any local or regional board of education, council, operator or
supervisory agent that receives information that an applicant for a
position with or an employee of the board is under investigation or has
been disciplined for a finding of abuse or neglect or sexual misconduct
shall notify the Department of Education of such information.
(c) No local or regional board of education, council, operator or
supervisory agent shall employ an applicant for a position involving
direct student contact who does not comply with the provisions of
subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section.
(d) A local or regional board of education, council, operator or
supervisory agent may employ or contract with an applicant on a
temporary basis for a period not to exceed ninety days, pending the
Public Act No. 26-139 10 of 17

Substitute House Bill No. 5323
review of information received under this section by such board,
council, operator or supervisory agent, provided:
(1) The applicant complied with subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of
this section;
(2) The board, council, operator or supervisory agent has no
knowledge of information pertaining to the applicant that would
disqualify the applicant from employment with the board, council,
operator or supervisory agent; and
(3) The applicant affirms that the applicant is not disqualified from
employment with such board, council, operator or supervisory agent.
(e) No local or regional board of education, council, operator or
supervisory agent shall enter into a collective bargaining agreement, an
employment contract, an agreement for resignation or termination, a
severance agreement or any other contract or agreement or take any
action that:
(1) Has the effect of suppressing or requiring the nondisclosure of
information relating to [an] a pending investigation of a report of
suspected abuse or neglect or sexual misconduct by a current or former
employee;
(2) Affects the ability of the local or regional board of education,
council, operator or supervisory agent to report suspected abuse or
neglect or sexual misconduct to appropriate authorities; or
(3) Requires the local or regional board of education, council,
operator or supervisory agent to expunge information about an
allegation or a finding of suspected abuse or neglect or sexual
misconduct from any documents maintained by the board, unless after
investigation such allegation is [dismissed or] found to be false.
Public Act No. 26-139 11 of 17

Substitute House Bill No. 5323
(f) No local or regional board of education, council, operator or
supervisory agent shall offer employment to a person as a substitute
teacher, unless such person and such board, council, operator or
supervisory agent comply with the provisions of subsection (a) of this
section. The board, council, operator or supervisory agent shall
determine which such persons are employable as substitute teachers
and maintain a list of such persons. No board, council, operator or
supervisory agent shall hire any person as a substitute teacher who is
not on such list. Such person shall remain on such list as long as such
person is continuously employed by the board, council, operator or
supervisory agent as a substitute teacher, as described in subsection (c)
of section 10-221d, provided the board, council, operator or supervisory
agent does not have any knowledge of a reason that such person should
be removed from such list.
(g) In the case of an applicant who is a contractor, the contractor shall
require any employee with such contractor who would be in a position
involving direct student contact to supply to such contractor all
information required of an applicant under subparagraphs (A) and (C)
of subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section and a written
authorization under subparagraph (B) of said subdivision. Such
contractor shall contact any current or former employer of such
employee that was a local or regional board of education, council,
operator or supervisory agent or if such employment caused the
employee to have contact with children, and request, either
telephonically or through written communication, any information
concerning whether there is a pending or open investigation or was a
finding of abuse or neglect or sexual misconduct against such employee.
Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (g) of section 31-51i, such
employer shall report to the contractor any such investigation or
finding, either telephonically or through written communication. If the
contractor receives any information indicating such [a] investigation or
finding or otherwise has knowledge of such [a] investigation or finding,
Public Act No. 26-139 12 of 17

Substitute House Bill No. 5323
the contractor shall, notwithstanding the provisions of said subsection
(g), immediately forward such information to any local or regional
board of education, council, operator or supervisory agent with which
the contractor is under contract, either telephonically or through written
communication. Any local or regional board of education, council,
operator or supervisory agent that receives such information shall
determine whether such employee may work in a position involving
direct student contact at any school under the jurisdiction or control of
such board, council, operator or supervisory agent. No determination
by a local or regional board of education, council, operator or
supervisory agent that any such employee shall not work under any
such contract in any such position shall constitute a breach of such
contract.
(h) Any applicant who knowingly provides false information or
knowingly fails to disclose information required in subdivision (1) of
subsection (a) of this section shall be subject to discipline by the
employing local or regional board of education, council, operator or
supervisory agent that may include (1) denial of employment, or (2)
termination of the contract of a certified employee, in accordance with
the provisions of section 10-151.
(i) Any employer who provides information in accordance with
subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of this section or subsection (g) of this
section and the Department of Education for the provision of
information requested in accordance with subdivision (3) of said
subsection (a) shall be immune from criminal and civil liability,
provided the employer or department did not knowingly supply false
information.
(j) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-151c and subsection
(g) of section 31-51i, a local or regional board of education, council,
operator or supervisory agent shall provide upon request by any other
local or regional board of education, council, operator or supervisory
Public Act No. 26-139 13 of 17

Substitute House Bill No. 5323
agent for the purposes of an inquiry pursuant to subdivision (2) of
subsection (a) of this section or subsection (g) of this section or to the
Commissioner of Education pursuant to subsection (b) of this section
any information that the board, council, operator or supervisory agent
has concerning [a] an investigation or finding of abuse or neglect or
sexual misconduct by a subject of any such inquiry.
(k) For purposes of this section and section 10-221d, as amended by
this act, (1) "sexual misconduct" means any verbal, nonverbal, written
or electronic communication, or any other act directed toward or with a
student that is designed to establish a sexual relationship with the
student, including a sexual invitation, dating or soliciting a date,
engaging in sexual dialog, making sexually suggestive comments, self-
disclosure or physical exposure of a sexual or erotic nature and any
other sexual, indecent or erotic contact with a student; (2) "abuse or
neglect" means abuse or neglect as described in section 46b-120, and
includes any violation of section 53a-70, 53a-70a, 53a-71, 53a-72a, 53a-
72b or 53a-73a; and (3) "former employer" means any local or regional
board of education, governing council of a state or local charter school
or interdistrict magnet school operator, person, firm, business,
educational institution, nonprofit agency, corporation, limited liability
company, the state, any political subdivision of the state, any
governmental agency, or any other entity that such applicant was
employed by during any of the previous twenty years prior to applying
for a position with a local or regional board of education, governing
council of a state or local charter school or interdistrict magnet school
operator.
(l) Prior to offering employment to an applicant, a local or regional
board of education, council, operator or supervisory agent shall make a
documented good faith effort to contact each current and any former
employer that was a local or regional board of education, council,
operator or supervisory agent or if such employment otherwise caused
Public Act No. 26-139 14 of 17

Substitute House Bill No. 5323
the applicant to have contact with children of the applicant in order to
obtain information and recommendations which may be relevant to the
applicant's fitness for employment, including whether there is a
pending investigation of the applicant for allegations of abuse or neglect
or sexual misconduct, provided such effort shall not be construed to
require more than three telephonic requests made on three separate
days.
(m) No local or regional board of education, council, operator or
supervisory agent shall offer employment to any applicant who had any
previous employment contract terminated by a board, council, operator
or supervisory agent or who resigned from such employment, if such
[person] applicant (1) has been convicted of a violation of section 17a-
101o, [when] or (2) has had an allegation of abuse or neglect or sexual
[assault has been] misconduct substantiated.
Sec. 12. Subsection (f) of section 10-221d of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(f) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (g) of section 31-51i,
and to the extent permissible under state and federal laws regarding the
dissemination of criminal history records, the State Board of Education
shall, upon request of an eligible school operator, make available to such
eligible school operator requesting information concerning an applicant
for a position with such eligible school operator (1) any information
concerning the applicant's eligibility for employment in a position with
such eligible school operator requiring a certificate, authorization or
permit issued pursuant to chapter 166, (2) whether the department has
knowledge that the applicant has been disciplined for a finding of abuse
or neglect or sexual misconduct, as defined in section 10-222c, as
amended by this act, and any information concerning such a finding,
[and] (3) whether the department has received notification that the
applicant has been convicted of a crime or of criminal charges pending
Public Act No. 26-139 15 of 17

Substitute House Bill No. 5323
against the applicant and any information concerning such charges, and
(4) whether the department has been notified pursuant to subsection (b)
of section 10-222c, as amended by this act, that the applicant is under
investigation or has been disciplined for a finding of abuse or neglect or
sexual misconduct by a former employer, as defined in section 10-222c,
as amended by this act, unless the investigation resulted in a finding
that all allegations were false. The provisions of this subsection shall not
be construed to cause the state board to investigate any such request or
disseminate the results of any national criminal history records check.
Sec. 13. Subsection (f) of section 10-232a of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(f) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (g) of section 31-51i,
and to the extent permissible under state and federal laws regarding the
dissemination of criminal history records, the State Board of Education
shall, upon request of a nongovernmental school operator, make
available to such nongovernmental school operator requesting
information concerning an applicant for a position with such
nongovernmental school operator, (1) any information concerning the
applicant's eligibility for employment in a position with such
nongovernmental school operator requiring a certificate, authorization
or permit issued pursuant to chapter 166, (2) whether the department
has knowledge that the applicant has been disciplined for a finding of
abuse or neglect or sexual misconduct, as defined in section 10-222c, as
amended by this act, and any information concerning such a finding,
[and] (3) whether the department has received notification that the
applicant has been convicted of a crime or of criminal charges pending
against the applicant and any information concerning such charges, and
(4) whether the department has been notified pursuant to subsection (b)
of section 10-222c, as amended by this act, that the applicant is under
investigation or has been disciplined for a finding of abuse or neglect or
Public Act No. 26-139 16 of 17

Substitute House Bill No. 5323
sexual misconduct by a former employer, as defined in section 10-222c,
as amended by this act, unless the investigation resulted in a finding
that all allegations were false. The provisions of this subsection shall not
be construed to cause the state board to investigate any such request or
disseminate the results of any national criminal history records check.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Public Act No. 26-139 17 of 17